Utah statutes.
67-4a-402.   Publication of notice.

Within 12 months of the date the unclaimed property was paid or delivered to the administrator, the administrator shall:

(1)  cause a notice to be published:

(a)  once in a newspaper having general circulation in Utah; and

(b)  as required in Section 45-1-101; and

(2)  ensure that the notice described in Subsection (1)(a) is in a form that is likely to attract the attention of the apparent owner of the unclaimed property.



Amended by Chapter 388, 2009 General Session

